North Dakota, session 69, SB2286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA
HEALTH PROFESSIONS COLLABORATIVE FACILITY. During the 2025-26 interim, the
legislative management shall consider studying the funding necessary to provide education and
internships statewide for all programs at an expanded university of North Dakota health
professions collaborative facility. The study may consider input from the university of North
Dakota school of medicine and health sciences advisory council and other statutory boards and
councils related to all health profession degrees provided by the university of North Dakota in
the development of the health professions collaborative facility. The legislative management
shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation necessary to
implement the recommendations to the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA - SCHOOL OF
MEDICINE AND HEALTH SCIENCES - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$55,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, and from other funds, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $40,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
university of North Dakota for the purpose of constructing an addition to the school of medicine
and health sciences to create a health professions collaborative facility to expand workforce
capacity relating to health, behavioral health, and wellness in the state, and to foster a robust
environment for research and discovery to enhance academic excellence, for the biennium
Page No. 1 25.1218.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is
considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 2 25.1218.04000